Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1720
Seller-assisted marketing plan; certain sale, lease, or offer; excluded.

A seller-assisted marketing plan shall not include a sale, lease, or offer to sell or lease to a purchaser: (1) Who has for a period of at least six months previously bought products, supplies, services, or equipment which were sold under the same trademark or trade name or which were produced by the seller; and (2) who has received on resale of such product, supplies, services, or equipment an amount which is at least equal to the amount of the initial payment.

Laws 1979, LB 180, § 20.